Missouri, session 2026, HB2483.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 188.015, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 188.015, to read as follows:
188.015. 1. As used in this chapter, the following terms mean:
(1) "Abortion"[:
(a) The act of using or prescribing any instrument, device, medicine, drug, or any
other means or substance with the intent to destroy the life of an embryo or fetus in his or her
mother's womb; or
(b) The intentional termination of the pregnancy of a mother by using or prescribing
any instrument, device, medicine, drug, or other means or substance with an intention other
than to increase the probability of a live birth or to remove a dead unborn child], any medical
treatment intended to induce the termination of a pregnancy, except for the purpose of
producing a live birth;
(2) "Abortion facility", a clinic, physician's office, or any other place or facility in
which abortions are performed or induced other than a hospital;
(3) "Affiliate", a person who or entity that enters into, with an abortion facility, a legal
relationship created or governed by at least one written instrument, including a certificate of
formation, a franchise agreement, standards of affiliation, bylaws, or a license, that
demonstrates:
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2483 2
(a) Common ownership, management, or control between the parties to the
relationship;
(b) A franchise granted by the person or entity to the affiliate; or
(c) The granting or extension of a license or other agreement authorizing the affiliate
to use the other person's or entity's brand name, trademark, service mark, or other registered
identification mark;
(4) "Conception", the fertilization of the ovum [of a female] by a sperm [of a male];
(5) "Department", the department of health and senior services;
(6) "Down Syndrome", the same meaning as defined in section 191.923;
(7) "Gestational age", length of pregnancy as measured from the first day of the
[woman's] person's last menstrual period;
(8) "Medical emergency", a condition which, based on reasonable medical judgment,
so complicates the medical condition of a pregnant [woman] person as to necessitate the
immediate abortion of [her] thepregnancy to avert the death of the pregnant [woman] person
or for which a delay will create a serious risk of substantial and irreversible physical
impairment of a major bodily function of the pregnant [woman] person;
(9) "Physician", any person licensed to practice medicine in this state by the state
board of registration for the healing arts;
(10) "Reasonable medical judgment", a medical judgment that would be made by a
reasonably prudent physician, knowledgeable about the case and the treatment possibilities
with respect to the medical conditions involved;
(11) ["Unborn child", the offspring of human beings from the moment of conception
until birth and at every stage of its biological development, including the human conceptus,
zygote, morula, blastocyst, embryo, and fetus;
(12)] "Viability" [or "viable", that stage of fetal development when the life of the
unborn child may be continued indefinitely outside the womb by natural or artificial life-
supportive systems;
(13) "Viable pregnancy" or "viable intrauterine pregnancy", in the first trimester of
pregnancy, an intrauterine pregnancy that can potentially result in a liveborn baby], the point
in a pregnancy when, in the good faith medical judgment of a physician, or the
particular facts of the case before that physician, there is a reasonable likelihood of the
fetus's sustained survival outside the uterus without the application of extraordinary
medical measures.
2. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the state shall protect a person's
right to terminate a pregnancy.
3. No prosecution or proceeding shall be brought or maintained under state
criminal law or otherwise for acts that are authorized or permitted under this section.

HB 2483 3
4. The provisions of this section shall be severable, and if any phrase, clause,
sentence, or provision is declared to be invalid or is preempted by federal law or
regulation, the validity of the remainder of this section shall not be affected.
✔